Maryland, session 2026, HB1421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Pedestrian and Bicyclist Injuries and
Fatalities.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the State Highway Administrator, or the Administrator’s designee; and
(5) the Director of Bicycle and Pedestrian Access, or the Director’s
designee.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1421*

HOUSE BILL 1421
(c) The Secretary of Transportation or the Secretary’s designee shall chair the
Task Force.
(d) The Department of Transportation shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall study and make recommendations on:
(1) pedestrian injuries and fatalities in the State, including:
(i) challenges related to pedestrian visibility; and
(ii) how the wearing of dark clothing at night by a pedestrian affects
the likelihood of the pedestrian being struck by a motor vehicle, bicyclist, or other
pedestrian;
(2) bicyclist injuries and fatalities in the State, including how inclement
weather and poor visibility affect bicyclist injuries and fatalities;
(3) actions pedestrians and bicyclists can take to reduce their own
negligence; and
(4) priorities and needs for making roadways safe for pedestrians and
bicyclists.
(g) On or before October 1, 2027, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 3 months, at the end of
September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.